Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-818
Attorney General and other law enforcement authority; powers and duties.

The Tax Commissioner or the director may confer with the Attorney General or his or her designee as he or she deems necessary and advisable to carry out the responsibilities of the division. Upon request of the director with the approval of the Tax Commissioner, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General and any other law enforcement authority to whom a violation is reported to investigate and cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted without delay.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 38.